Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.110

Restrictive zones.

For any or all of such purposes the council or board, on recommendation of its commission, may divide the municipality or any portion thereof into districts of such size, shape and area, or may establish such official maps, or development plans for the whole or any portion of the municipality as may be deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of this chapter and within such districts it may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures or land.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.63.110. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 6; RRS s 9322-6.]